bg-BG: Тип еластичност на плата: 2-посочна еластичност; 4-посочна еластичност; Висока еластичност; Механична еластичност; Без еластичност; Друго
fi: Kankaan venyvyystyyppi: Kahteen suuntaan joustava; Neljään suuntaan joustava; Erittäin joustava; Mekaaninen jousto; Joustamaton; Muu
en: Fabric stretch type: 2-way stretch; 4-way stretch; High stretch; Mechanical stretch; Non-stretch; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de elasticitate al țesăturii: Extensibil pe 2 direcții; Extensibil pe 4 direcții; Elasticitate ridicată; Elasticitate mecanică; Fără elasticitate; Altele
hu: Szövet rugalmassági típusa: 2 irányban rugalmas; 4 irányban rugalmas; Nagyfokú rugalmasság; Mechanikusan rugalmas; Nem rugalmas; Egyéb
it: Tipo di elasticità del tessuto: Elasticizzato in 2 direzioni; Elasticizzato in 4 direzioni; Altamente elasticizzato; Elasticità meccanica; Non elasticizzato; Altro
nb: Strekktype for stoff: 2-veis stretch; 4-veis stretch; Høy stretch; Mekanisk stretch; Uten stretch; Annet
ko: 패브릭 스트레치 유형: 2방향 스트레치; 4방향 스트레치; 고탄력; 기계적 스트레치; 비신축성; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta raztegljivosti blaga: 2-smerna raztegljivost; 4-smerna raztegljivost; Visoka raztegljivost; Mehanska raztegljivost; Neraztegljivo; Drugo
vi: Kiểu co giãn của vải: Co giãn 2 chiều; Co giãn 4 chiều; Độ co giãn cao; Co giãn cơ học; Không co giãn; Khác
pl: Typ elastyczności tkaniny: 2-kierunkowy stretch; 4-kierunkowy stretch; Mocny stretch; Stretch mechaniczny; Nierozciągliwe; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de elasticidade do tecido: Elasticidade em 2 direções; Elasticidade em 4 direções; Alta elasticidade; Elasticidade mecânica; Sem elasticidade; Outros
ru: Тип растяжимости ткани: Растяжимость в 2 направлениях; Растяжимость в 4 направлениях; Высокая растяжимость; Механическая растяжимость; Без растяжимости; Другое
fr: Type de tissu extensible: Extensible dans 2 sens; Extensible dans 4 sens; Haute extensibilité; Extensibilité mécanique; Non extensible; Autre
th: ประเภทความยืดหยุ่นของผ้า: ยืด 2 ทิศทาง; ยืด 4 ทิศทาง; ยืดหยุ่นสูง; ยืดหยุ่นเชิงกล; ไม่ยืด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ pružnosti tkaniny: 2-smerne elastická; 4-smerne elastická; Vysoko elastická; Mechanicky elastická; Neelastická; Iný
es: Tipo de estiramiento de la tela: Estiramiento en 2 direcciones; Estiramiento en 4 direcciones; Muy elástico; Estiramiento mecánico; No elástico; Otro
ja: 生地伸縮タイプ: 2WAYストレッチ; 4WAYストレッチ; 高ストレッチ; メカニカルストレッチ; ノンストレッチ; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de elasticidade do tecido: Elasticidade em 2 direções; Elasticidade em 4 direções; Alta elasticidade; Elasticidade mecânica; Sem elasticidade; Outro
nl: Type rekbaarheid stof: 2-way stretch; 4-way stretch; Hoge stretch; Mechanische stretch; Geen stretch; Overig
zh-CN: 面料弹力类型: 两面弹; 四面弹; 高弹力; 机械弹力; 无弹力; 其他
de: Dehnungsart des Stoffes: 2-Wege-Stretch; 4-Wege-Stretch; Hoher Stretchanteil; Mechanischer Stretch; Ohne Stretchanteil; Sonstiges
tr: Kumaş esneme tipi: 2 yönlü esneme; 4 yönlü esneme; Yüksek esneme; Mekanik esneme; Esnek olmayan; Diğer
da: Stoffets stræktype: 2-vejs-stræk; 4-vejs-stræk; Højt stræk; Mekanisk stræk; Uden stræk; Andet
el: Τύπος ελαστικότητας υφάσματος: Ελαστικότητα 2 κατευθύνσεων; Ελαστικότητα 4 κατευθύνσεων; Υψηλή ελαστικότητα; Μηχανική ελαστικότητα; Μη ελαστικό; Άλλο
sv: Stretchtyp: Tvåvägsstretch; Fyrvägsstretch; Hög stretch; Mekanisk stretch; Ingen stretch; Övrigt
zh-TW: 布料彈性類型: 雙向彈性; 四向彈性; 高彈性; 機械彈性; 無彈性; 其他
cs: Typ pružné tkaniny: Pružné ve 2 směrech; Pružné ve 4 směrech; Vysoce pružné; Mechanicky pružné; Nepružné; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta rastezljivosti tkanine: Rastezljivo u 2 smjera; Rastezljivo u 4 smjera; Visoka rastezljivost; Mehanička rastezljivost; Bez rastezanja; Ostalo
lt-LT: Audinio tamprumo tipas: Dviem kryptimis tamprus; Keturiomis kryptimis tamprus; Labai tamprus; Mechaniškai tamprus; Netamprus; Kitas